src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_POLITIIKKA
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 9 k~0
!!€  politiikka: politiikka+N+Sg+Nom # politics
!!€  politiikkaa: politiikka+N+Sg+Par
!!€  politiikkana: politiikka+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  politiikassa: politiikka+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  politiikkoina: politiikka+N+Pl+Ess
!!€  politiikkojen: politiikka+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  politiikkoihin: politiikka+N+Pl+Ill
0:ka  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ka  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:a  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ka  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ka  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:ka  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:ko  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:ka  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_TIPPA
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 9 p~0
!!€  tippa: tippa+N+Sg+Nom # drop
!!€  tippaa: tippa+N+Sg+Par
!!€  tippana: tippa+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  tipassa: tippa+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  tippoina: tippa+N+Pl+Ess
!!€  tippojen: tippa+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  tippoihin: tippa+N+Pl+Ill
0:pa  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pa  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:a  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:po  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:pa  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:pa  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:po  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:po  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:pa  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:po  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:pa  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:po  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:pa  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_MITTA
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 9 t~0
!!€  mitta: mitta+N+Sg+Nom # measure
!!€  mittaa: mitta+N+Sg+Par
!!€  mittana: mitta+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  mitassa: mitta+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  mittoina: mitta+N+Pl+Ess
!!€  mittojen: mitta+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  mittoihin: mitta+N+Pl+Ill
0:ta  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ta  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:a  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:to  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ta  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ta  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:to  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:to  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:ta  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:to  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ta  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:to  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:ta  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_VIKA
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 9 k~’~0
!!€  vika: vika+N+Sg+Nom # error
!!€  vikana: vika+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  viassa: vika+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  vi’assa: vika+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  vikoina: vika+N+Pl+Ess
!!€  vikojen: vika+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  vikoihin: vika+N+Pl+Ill
0:ka  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ka  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
+Use/NG:’a  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:a  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
+Use/NG:’o  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ka  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ka  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:ka  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ka  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
+Use/NG:’a  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:ko  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:ka  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_VAAKA
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 9 k~’
!!€  vaaka: vaaka+N+Sg+Nom # scale
!!€  vaakana: vaaka+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  vaa’assa: vaaka+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  vaaoissa: vaaka+N+Pl+Ine
!!€  vaa’oissa: vaaka+N+Pl+Ine
0:ka  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
+Use/NG:ka  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:’a  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
+Use/NG:’o  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ka  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ka  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:ka  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ka  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
+Use/NG:’a  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:ko  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:ka  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;
0:ka  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT ;  ! FMT: check

! raaka+N:raa  NOUN_VAAKA  ;

LEXICON NOUN_SALPA
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 9 p~v
!!€  salpa: salpa+N+Sg+Nom # bolt
!!€  salpaa: salpa+N+Sg+Par
!!€  salpana: salpa+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  salvassa: salpa+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  salpoina: salpa+N+Pl+Ess
!!€  salpojen: salpa+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  salpoihin: salpa+N+Pl+Ill
0:pa  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pa  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:va  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:po  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:vo  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:pa  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:pa  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:po  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:po  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:pa  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:po  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:pa  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:va  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:po  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:pa  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_PATA
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 9 t~d
!!€  pata: pata+N+Sg+Nom # kettle
!!€  pataa: pata+N+Sg+Par
!!€  patana: pata+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  padassa: pata+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  patoina: pata+N+Pl+Ess
!!€  patojen: pata+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  patoihin: pata+N+Pl+Ill
0:ta  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ta  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:da  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:to  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:do  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ta  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ta  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:to  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:to  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:ta  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:to  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ta  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:da  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:to  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:ta  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_LANKA
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 9 k~g
!!€  lanka: lanka+N+Sg+Nom # yarn
!!€  lankaa: lanka+N+Sg+Par
!!€  lankana: lanka+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  langassa: lanka+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  lankoina: lanka+N+Pl+Ess
!!€  lankojen: lanka+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  lankoihin: lanka+N+Pl+Ill
0:ka  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ka  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ga  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:go  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ka  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ka  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:ka  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ka  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:ga  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:ko  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:ka  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_RAMPA
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 9 p~m
!!€  rampa: rampa+N+Sg+Nom # cripple
!!€  rampaa: rampa+N+Sg+Par
!!€  rampana: rampa+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  rammassa: rampa+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  rampoina: rampa+N+Pl+Ess
!!€  rampojen: rampa+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  rampoihin: rampa+N+Pl+Ill
0:pa  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pa  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ma  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:po  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:mo  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:pa  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:pa  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:po  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:po  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:pa  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:po  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:pa  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:ma  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:po  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:pa  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_VALTA
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 9 t~l
!!€  valta: valta+N+Sg+Nom # power
!!€  valtaa: valta+N+Sg+Par
!!€  valtana: valta+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  vallassa: valta+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  valtoina: valta+N+Pl+Ess
!!€  valtojen: valta+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  valtoihin: valta+N+Pl+Ill
0:ta  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ta  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:la  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:to  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:lo  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ta  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ta  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:to  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:to  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:ta  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:to  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ta  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:la  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:to  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:ta  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;
