src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_Cmp
aamukampa+N:aamukam  NOUN_RAMPA  ;
arki-ilta+N:arki-il  NOUN_VALTA  ;
bambuvapa+N:bambuva  NOUN_SALPA  ;
dinka+N:din  NOUN_LANKA  ;
edustajanpaikka+N:edustajan#paik  NOUN_POLITIIKKA  ;
etelänapa+N:eteläna  NOUN_SALPA  ;
etsauslaatta+N:etsauslaat  NOUN_MITTA  ;
etuvaaka+N:etuvaa  NOUN_VAAKA  ;
gaalailta+N:gaalail  NOUN_VALTA  ;
haljasnahka+N:haljasnah  NOUN_VIKA  ;
halpatavarakauppa+N:halpa#tavarakaup  NOUN_TIPPA  ;
haritusrauta+N:haritusrau  NOUN_PATA  ;
harsinlanka+N:harsinlan  NOUN_LANKA  ;
huomenilta+N:huomen#il  NOUN_VALTA  ;
ikkunanhaka+N:ikkunan#ha  NOUN_VAAKA  ;
ikkunapaikka+N:ikkuna#paik  NOUN_POLITIIKKA  ;
ilmakuvakartta+N:ilma#kuva#kart  NOUN_MITTA  ;
jääraappa+N:jääraap  NOUN_TIPPA  ;
järjestämistapa+N:järjestämis#ta NOUN_SALPA ;
johdinaita+N:johdin#ai NOUN_PATA ;
jokisiika+N:joki#sii NOUN_VIKA ;
jouluaattoilta+N:jouluaattoil  NOUN_VALTA  ;
jousivaaka+N:jousi#vaa  NOUN_VAAKA  ;
kalalanka+N:kalalan  NOUN_LANKA  ;
kalevalanmitta+N:kalevalanmit  NOUN_MITTA  ;
kampa+N:kam  NOUN_RAMPA  ;
karbiinihaka+N:karbiini#ha  NOUN_VAAKA  ;
karduaaninahka+N:karduaaninah  NOUN_VIKA  ;
kasvupolitiikka+N:kasvu#politiik  NOUN_POLITIIKKA  ;
katsomustapa+N:katsomus#ta  NOUN_SALPA  ;
keisarinelämänlanka+N:keisarinelämänlan  NOUN_LANKA  ;
kemikaalivaaka+N:kemikaalivaa  NOUN_VAAKA  ;
kertakäyttövaippa+N:kerta#käyttö#vaip  NOUN_TIPPA  ;
keskusvalta+N:keskus#val  NOUN_VALTA  ;
kiikkulauta+N:kiikku#lau  NOUN_PATA  ;
kiipimäjalka+N:kiipimäjal  NOUN_VIKA  ;
kohopainolaatta+N:kohopainolaat  NOUN_MITTA  ;
koristekampa+N:koriste#kam  NOUN_RAMPA  ;
koristekampa+N:koristekam  NOUN_RAMPA  ;
kotimaankauppa+N:kotimaankaup  NOUN_TIPPA  ;
kotipaikka+N:koti#paik  NOUN_POLITIIKKA  ;
kultavaaka+N:kulta#vaa  NOUN_VAAKA  ;
kunniavelka+N:kunnia#vel  NOUN_VIKA  ;
kuolintapa+N:kuolinta  NOUN_SALPA  ;
kuparikampa+N:kupari#kam NOUN_RAMPA ;
kuristuslanka+N:kuristuslan  NOUN_LANKA  ;
kuvalatta+N:kuva#lat  NOUN_MITTA  ;
laivasilta+N:laivasil  NOUN_VALTA  ;
lapsenpiika+N:lapsenpii  NOUN_VIKA  ;
lattajalka+N:latta#jal  NOUN_POLITIIKKA  ;
laukkukauppa+N:laukku#kaup  NOUN_TIPPA  ;
laulutapa+N:laulu#ta  NOUN_SALPA  ;
lauta-aita+N:lauta-ai  NOUN_PATA  ;
liukupainovaaka+N:liukupaino#vaa  NOUN_VAAKA  ;
luukampa+N:luu#kam  NOUN_RAMPA  ;
maalaustapa+N:maalausta  NOUN_SALPA  ;
määrämitta+N:määrämit  NOUN_MITTA  ;
maatalouskauppa+N:maa#talous#kaup  NOUN_TIPPA  ;
mekanotriikka+N:mekanotriik  NOUN_POLITIIKKA  ;
meluaita+N:melu#ai  NOUN_PATA  ;
merivalta+N:meri#val  NOUN_VALTA  ;
merkkauslanka+N:merkkauslan  NOUN_LANKA  ;
metsähaapa+N:metsähaa  NOUN_SALPA  ;
mikrosukaskampa+N:mikrosukas#kam  NOUN_RAMPA  ;
mosaiikkilaatta+N:mosaiikki#laat  NOUN_MITTA  ;
nikhaka+N:nikha  NOUN_VIKA  ;
nimikoimislanka+N:nimikoimislan  NOUN_LANKA  ;
nuotiopaikka+N:nuotio#paik  NOUN_POLITIIKKA  ;
ompelutarvikekauppa+N:ompelutarvikekaup  NOUN_TIPPA  ;
pääkampa+N:pää#kam  NOUN_RAMPA  ;
paikkatietokartta+N:paikka#tieto#kart  NOUN_MITTA  ;
parisuhdeväkivalta+N:parisuhdeväkival  NOUN_VALTA  ;
parsinlanka+N:parsinlan  NOUN_LANKA  ;
pelilauta+N:peli#lau  NOUN_PATA  ;
permantopaikka+N:permanto#paik  NOUN_POLITIIKKA  ;
pinotapa+N:pinota  NOUN_SALPA  ;
pitkähäntäpiikkisika+N:pitkähäntä#piikkisi  NOUN_VIKA  ;
posliinikauppa+N:posliini#kaup  NOUN_TIPPA  ;
punapaita+N:puna#pai  NOUN_PATA  ;
puolueettomuuspolitiikka+N:puolueettomuuspolitiik  NOUN_POLITIIKKA  ;
raaka+N:raa  NOUN_VAAKA  ;
rampa+N:ram  NOUN_RAMPA  ;
reittikartta+N:reitti#kart  NOUN_MITTA  ;
roiskelauta+N:roiskelau  NOUN_PATA  ;
rullalanka+N:rullalan  NOUN_LANKA  ;
salakauppa+N:sala#kaup  NOUN_TIPPA  ;
salpa+N:sal  NOUN_SALPA  ;
sarviniekka+N:sarviniek  NOUN_POLITIIKKA  ;
saunailta+N:saunail  NOUN_VALTA  ;
savusiika+N:savusii  NOUN_VIKA  ;
silkkipaita+N:silkki#pai  NOUN_PATA  ;
suuntaviitta+N:suunta#viit  NOUN_MITTA  ;
taidehuutokauppa+N:taide#huuto#kaup  NOUN_TIPPA  ;
täikampa+N:täikam  NOUN_RAMPA  ;
takavaaka+N:taka#vaa  NOUN_VAAKA  ;
taskukampa+N:taskukam  NOUN_RAMPA  ;
tekstiililanka+N:tekstiililan  NOUN_LANKA  ;
tievaaka+N:tievaa  NOUN_VAAKA  ;
tilivelka+N:tilivel  NOUN_VIKA  ;
toimeenpanovalta+N:toimeenpanoval  NOUN_VALTA  ;
Tpaita+N:T#pai  NOUN_PATA  ;
tulkintatapa+N:tulkintata  NOUN_SALPA  ;
turkishuutokauppa+N:turkishuutokaup  NOUN_TIPPA  ;
työskentelypaikka+N:työskentely#paik  NOUN_POLITIIKKA  ;
vakiomitta+N:vakiomit  NOUN_MITTA  ;
vastakauppa+N:vasta#kaup  NOUN_TIPPA  ;
verkkopaita+N:verkko#pai  NOUN_PATA  ;
viikinkiaika+N:viikinkiai  NOUN_VIKA  ;
virkkuulanka+N:virkkuulan  NOUN_LANKA  ;
yksikuppivaaka+N:yksikuppivaa  NOUN_VAAKA  ;
yksinvalta+N:yksinval  NOUN_VALTA  ;
